en: Powdered Khorasan wheat milks, Powdered Kamut milks, Powdered Khorasan wheat drinks, Powdered Kamut drinks
es: Leches de trigo de Jorasán en polvo, Leches de Kamut en polvo, Bebidas de trigo de Jorasán en polvo, Bebidas de Kamut en polvo
fr: Laits de blé khorasan en poudre, Laits de blé de Khorasan en poudre, Laits de Kamut en poudre
hr: Khorasan pšenično mlijeko u prahu
nl: Kamutdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered spelt milks, Powdered spelt drinks
es: Leches de espelta en polvo, Bebidas de espelta en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales d'épeautre en poudre, Laits d’épeautre en poudre
hr: Speltino mlijeko u prahu
nl: Speltdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered legume milks, Powdered legume drinks
es: Leches de leguminosas en polvo, Bebidas de leguminosas en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de légumineuses en poudre, Laits de légumineuses en poudre
hr: Mlijeka od mahunarki u prahu
nl: Bonendranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered soy milks, Powdered soya milks, Powdered soya drinks, Powdered soy drinks
es: Leches de soja en polvo, Bebidas de soja en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de soja en poudre, laits de soja en poudre
hr: Sojino mlijeko u prahu
nl: Sojadranken in poedervorm
pl: Sojowe mleka w proszku, Sojowe napoje w proszku

en: Powdered nut milks, Powdered nut drinks
es: Leches de frutos de cáscara en polvo, Bebidas de frutos de cáscara en polvo, Leches de frutos secos en polvo, Bebidas de frutos secos en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de fruits à coque en poudre, Laits de fruits à coques en poudre
hr: Orašasto mlijeko u prahu
nl: Notendranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered almond milks, Powdered almond drinks
es: Leches de almendra en polvo, Bebidas de almendra en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales d'amande en poudre, Laits d'amande en poudre, lait d’amande en poudre
hr: Bademovo mlijeko u prahu
nl: Amandeldranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered chestnut milks, Powdered chestnut drinks
es: Leches de castaña en polvo, Bebidas de castaña en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de châtaigne en poudre, Laits de châtaigne en poudre
hr: Mlijeka od kestena u prahu
nl: Kastanjedranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered hazelnut milks, Powdered hazelnut drinks
es: Leches de avellana en polvo, Bebidas de avellana en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de noisettes en poudre, Laits de noisettes en poudre
hr: Mlijeka od lješnjaka u prahu
nl: Hazelnootdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered macadamia nut milks, Powdered macadamia nut drinks
es: Leches de nueces de macadamia en polvo, Bebidas de nueces de macadamia en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de noix de macadamia en poudre, Laits de noix de macadamia en poudre
hr: Mlijeko od oraha makadamije u prahu
nl: Macadamianootdranken in poedervorm

en: Powdered walnut milks, Powdered walnut drinks
es: Leches de nueces en polvo, Bebidas de nueces en polvo
fr: Boissons végétales de noix en poudre, Laits de noix en poudre
hr: Orahovo mlijeko u prahu
nl: Walnootdranken in poedervorm

en: Mountain milks
fr: Laits de montagne
hr: Planinska mlijeka
it: Latti di montagna
lt: Kalnų pienas
nl: Melk van bergkoeien

en: Cheese spreads
ca: Formatges d'untar
de: Streichkäse
es: Quesos para untar
fi: tuorejuustot
fr: Fromages à tartiner, Fromage à tartiner
he: ממרחי גבינה
hr: Sirni namazi
hu: Kenhető sajtok
it: Formaggi spalmabili
lt: Sūrio užtepėlės
nl: Smeerkazen, Smeerkaas
pt: Queijos para barrar

en: Uncured soft cheese spreadable with around 25% fat
fr: fromage à tartiner à environ 25% MG, Spécialité fromagère non affinée environ 25% MG, coque fromagère à environ 25% MG

en: Uncured soft cheese spreadable with around 20% fat
fr: fromage à tartiner à environ 20% MG, Spécialité fromagère non affinée environ 20% MG, coque fromagère à environ 20% MG

en: Flavoured uncured soft cheese spreadable with around 30-40% fat
fr: Fromages Ail et fines herbes

en: Yogurts, yoghourts, yoghurts, yogourts, jogurts
af: Jogurt
ar: لبن
bg: Кисело мляко
bn: দই
br: Yaourt
bs: Jogurt
ca: Iogurt
cs: Jogurt
cy: Iogwrt
da: Yoghurt
de: Joghurt, Jogurt, Joghurts, Jogurts
el: Γιαούρτι
eo: Jogurto
es: Yogures, yogur
et: Jogurt
eu: Jogurt
fa: ماست
fi: Jogurtti
fr: Yaourts, yahourts, yogourts, yoghourts
gl: Iogur
he: יוגורט
hi: दही
hr: jogurti, jogurt
hu: Joghurtok
id: Yoghurt
is: Jógúrt
it: yogurt, iogurt, yoghurt
ja: ヨーグルト
jv: Yoghurt
ko: 요구르트
ku: Mast
la: Iogurtum
lt: Jogurtai, Jogurtas
lv: Jogurts
ml: തൈര്
my: ဒိန်ချဉ်
ne: दही
nl: Yoghurts
nn: yoghurt
pl: jogurty, jogurt
pt: Iogurtes, yogurtes
qu: Yugur
ro: Iaurturi
ru: Йогурт
rw: Yawurute
sh: Jogurt
sk: Jogurt
sl: Jogurt
sq: Jogurti
sr: јогурт
sv: Yoghurtar, Yoghurt
ta: தயிர்
te: పెరుగు
th: นมเปรี้ยว
ti: ርግኦ
tr: Yoğurt
tt: Qatıq
zh: 酸奶

en: Lactose-free yogurts
bg: Кисело мляко без лактоза
de: laktosefreie Joghurts
es: Yogures sin lactosa
fi: Laktoosittomat jogurtit
fr: Yaourts sans lactose
hr: Jogurti bez laktoze
it: Yogurt senza lattosio
lt: Jogurtai be laktozės
nl: Lactose-vrije yoghurt, Lactose-vrije yoghurts, Yoghurt zonder lactose, Yoghurts zonder lactose
pl: Jogurty bez laktozy
pt: Iogurtes sem lactose

en: Plain yogurt with sugar
fr: Yaourt nature sucré, Yaourt sucré nature
hr: Obični jogurt sa šećerom
pl: Jogurt naturalny z cukrem

en: Yogurt drinks, Drinkable yogurts
bg: Кисело мляко за пиене
ca: Iogurt per beure
de: Trinkjoghurt, Trinkjogurt, Trinkjoghurts, Trinkjogurts
es: Yogures para beber
fi: Juotavat jogurtit
fr: Yaourts à boire
he: יוגורטים לשתייה
hr: Pitki jogurti
hu: Ivójoghurtok, Iható joghurtok
it: Yogurt da bere
ja: 飲むヨーグルト
lt: Geriami jogurtai, Jogurto gėrimai
nl: Drinkyoghurts, Yoghurtdranken
pl: Jogurty pitne, Jogurt pitny, Jogurt do picia
pt: Iogurtes líquidos
ru: Питьевые йогурты

en: Flavoured yogurt drinks, Flavoured drinkable yogurts, Yoghurt drinks (flavoured)
fr: Yaourts à boire aromatisés
nl: Yoghurtdranken met smaak